Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6115.03
Failure to file application; penalty.

Any person who fails to file an application for acquisition and obtain the prior approval of the director as required by section 44-6115 may be required by the director, after notice and hearing, to pay an administrative penalty of one hundred dollars for each day's delay not to exceed an aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars. The director may reduce the penalty if the person demonstrates to the director that the imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the person.

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 11.